Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-114
Departments; official seal.

Each department shall adopt an official seal.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 14, p. 439;

C.S.1922, § 7255;

C.S.1929, § 81-116;

R.S.1943, § 81-114.